Washington statutes.
RCW 2.32.260

Notes of outgoing reporter may be transcribed—Effect.

When the official reporter who has taken notes in any cause, shall thereafter cease to be such official reporter, any transcript thereafter made by him or her therefrom, or made by any competent person under the direction of the court, and duly certified to by the person making the same, under oath, as a full, true and correct transcript of said notes, the same shall have full force and effect the same as though certified by an official reporter of said court.

[ 2011 c 336 s 55; 1913 c 126 s 7; RRS s 42-7.]